Hawaii, session 2026, HB1522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has a strong, historic commitment to civil rights. The legislature further finds that the extension to the statute of limitations provided by this Act would ensure that individuals in Hawaii have greater access to civil-rights protections that reflect the community values of the State: fairness, dignity, and inclusion. The legislature also finds that this extension allows individuals with a more reasonable timeframe to recognize, report, and seek redress for unlawful discrimination under Hawaii state law. The purpose of this Act is to extend the statute of limitations for filing complaints with the Hawaii civil rights commission to one year. SECTION 2.  Section 368-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) No complaint shall be filed after the expiration of [one hundred eighty days] one year after the date: (1)  Upon which the alleged unlawful discriminatory practice occurred; or (2)  Of the last occurrence in a pattern of ongoing discriminatory practice." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________